Georgia, session 2025_26, HB677.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions of health, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
H. B. 677
- 1 -

LC 46 1148
"31-1-26.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'acute psychiatric care' means a level of care that
is highly structured for patients who are a risk to themselves or others.
(b) Every hospital and psychiatric residential treatment facility in this state shall adhere
to the following procedures for instances in which the parent, guardian, or legal custodian
of a child who has received psychiatric care or acute psychiatric care at such hospital or
facility fails to resume custody of such child within 48 hours of a physician's discharge
order from such hospital or facility:
(1) A task force shall be assembled which shall consist of a care coordinator, licensed
psychiatrist, and a representative of the Department of Human Services, the Department
of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, the commercial health insurer of
the child, if applicable, and the Medicaid care management organization of the child, if
applicable; and
(2) Such task force shall without delay make a medical placement of the child into an
appropriate environment for that child."
SECTION 2.
Article 1 of Chapter 20A of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
patient protection, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"33-20A-11.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'acute psychiatric care' means a level of care that
is highly structured for patients who are a risk to themselves or others.
(b) All managed care organizations in this state contracting with hospitals or psychiatric
residential treatment facilities to provide insurance coverage for psychiatric or acute
psychiatric care shall provide payment to such hospitals or facilities in the event that the
parent, guardian, or legal custodian of a child who has received such care at such hospital
H. B. 677
- 2 -

LC 46 1148
or facility fails to resume custody of such child within 48 hours of a physician's discharge
order from such hospital or facility.
(c) Such coverage shall provide for payment to the hospital or psychiatric residential
treatment facility for every day after a physician's discharge order of such child that the
child is not medically placed in an appropriate environment for that child, as follows:
(1) Six hundred and fifty dollars for psychiatric care at a psychiatric residential treatment
facility; or
(2) Seven hundred and eighty dollars for acute psychiatric care provided by a hospital,
psychiatric residential treatment facility, or other facility if such facility includes a crisis
stabilization unit or qualified residential treatment program.
(d) The payments referenced in subsection (c) of this Code section shall only be required
to be paid to such hospital or facility until such time as the child is medically placed in an
appropriate environment for that child."
SECTION 3.
Chapter 21A of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the "Medicaid Care
Management Organizations Act," is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
"33-21A-15.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'acute psychiatric care' means a level of care that
is highly structured for patients who are a risk to themselves or others.
(b) All care organizations in this state contracting with hospitals or psychiatric residential
treatment facilities to provide psychiatric or acute psychiatric care shall provide insurance
coverage requiring payment to such hospitals or facilities in the event that the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian of a child who has received acute psychiatric care at such
hospital or facility fails to resume custody of such child within 48 hours of a physician's
discharge order from such hospital or facility.
H. B. 677
- 3 -

LC 46 1148
(c) Such coverage shall provide for payment to the hospital or psychiatric residential
treatment facility for every day after a physician's discharge order of such child that the
child is not medically placed in an appropriate environment for that child, as follows:
(1) Six hundred and fifty dollars for psychiatric care at a psychiatric residential treatment
facility; or
(2) Seven hundred and eighty dollars for acute psychiatric care provided by a hospital,
psychiatric residential treatment facility, or other facility if such facility includes a crisis
stabilization unit or qualified residential treatment program.
(d) The payments referenced in subsection (c) of this Code section shall only be required
to be paid to such hospital or facility until such time as the child is medically placed in an
appropriate environment for that child.
(e) To implement the provisions of this Code section, the department shall, when
necessary, submit a Medicaid state plan amendment or waiver request to the United States
Department of Health and Human Services."
SECTION 4.
This Act shall apply to all policies, contracts, and certificates executed, delivered, issued for
delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 677
- 4 -